California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

29224.

Any money remaining in the Funding Fund, after all outstanding bonds, warrants, judgments, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness proposed to be refunded have been taken up and canceled, shall be deposited in the fund established for the payment of principal and interest on the refunding bonds and used only for paying such principal or interest as they mature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29225.

Refunding of revenue bonds of the district may be accomplished in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, all of the provisions of which are hereby made applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Temporary Borrowing [29230. - 29236.]

29230.

The district may borrow money for the purpose of defraying general administrative and preliminary expenses of the district, lawfully incurred, prior to the time moneys to be raised by the first tax levy for the district are available, a sum which shall not exceed five cents ($0.05) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of taxable property in the district at the time the moneys are borrowed, and to evidence such borrowing by notes bearing interest at a rate not to exceed six (6) per centum per annum. The notes shall be payable from the first tax levy made by the district and the tax levy shall contain a sum sufficient to provide for the payment of the
 notes and the interest thereon. The form of said notes their issuance and sale, will be governed by the applicable provisions referred to in Section 29233. The maturity of said notes shall not exceed two (2) years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29231.

At any time prior to the first receipt by the district of revenues from taxation, the counties within the district may loan any available money to the district for the purposes of organization and operation. Such expenditures shall constitute a proper expenditure of county funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29232.

The treasurers of the counties within the district shall pay into the treasury of the district all funds held by them to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29233.

The district may borrow money in accordance with the provisions of Article 7 (commencing at Section 53820), Chapter 4, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code, and these sections apply to and govern all such proceedings instituted under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29234.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized to be issued, but which have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the same from time to time, but the maximum maturity of any such notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of such original notes. Such notes may be paid from any moneys of the district available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid the notes shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the district in anticipation of which they were issued and if not
 so paid taxes may be levied for their payment in the same manner as taxes are levied for the payment of general obligation bonds pursuant to Section 29121 until such bonds are issued. Such notes shall not be issued in an amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the district has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of such authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. Such notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing the same may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the district authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29235.

(a) The district may borrow money for the purchase of transit vehicles, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 99501, transit equipment, or transportation facilities, or for capital improvements, by the issuance of grant anticipation notes issued pursuant to Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 53859) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code payable on the basis of any of the following:

(1) From appropriated state funds.

(2) From other funds committed, but not
 appropriated, and evidenced by an appropriate document of intent.

(3) On specific dates or events and evidenced by an appropriate document of intent. There shall be no liability on the state for funds appropriated but not allocated.

(b) In addition to the grant money that may be pledged for the payment of the notes pursuant to Section 53859.06 of the Government Code, the district may pledge as security, on terms that it deems appropriate, the transit vehicles or equipment, transportation facilities, or capital improvements acquired with the proceeds of the notes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

29236.

In addition to any other existing authority, the district may borrow money and incur indebtedness pursuant to Article 7.4 (commencing with Section 53835) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 37.3.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Revenue Bonds [29240. - 29241.]

29240.

As an alternative procedure for the raising of funds, the district is hereby authorized to issue bonds, payable from revenues of any facility or enterprise to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, all of the provisions of which are hereby made applicable to the district, provided however, that no election shall be required in the case of revenue bonds authorized by the board of directors for rapid transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district under this part,
 if prior to such authorization a proposition for the issuance of general obligation bonds has been adopted by vote of the qualified electors of the district pursuant to Section 29168; and provided, further, that nothing contained in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall be deemed to restrict the power of the district to levy taxes and use their proceeds for all district purposes within the restrictions established by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29241.

The district is hereby declared to be a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941. The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall for all purposes of this part include rapid transit facilities and any and all parts thereof and all additions, extensions and improvements thereto and all other facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district under this part. The district may issue revenue bonds under such law for any one or more facilities or enterprises authorized to be acquired, constructed or completed by the district, or in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under such law for the acquisition,
 construction and completion of any one of such facilities and also issue bonds payable from assessments in accordance with the procedure provided by this part for any other of such facilities. Nothing in this part contained shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided hereunder for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the facilities or works authorized hereunder, and all such proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the directors may determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Equipment Trust Certificates [29250. - 29253.]

29250.

The district shall have power to purchase equipment such as cars, trolley buses and motor buses, rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the rapid transit business appropriate to effect such purchase and leasing of rolling equipment and may dispose of such equipment trust certificates upon such terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate. All money required to be paid by the district under the provisions of such agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates shall be payable solely from the revenue or income to be derived from the
 transportation system and from grants and loans as provided in Sections 29080 and 29081 of this part. Payment for such equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates payable solely from such revenue or income, and title to such equipment shall not vest in the district until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29251.

The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the State of California as trustee, lessor or vendor for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct such trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to simultaneously therewith execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29252.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before some person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds and such agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain such covenants, conditions and provisions which may be deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from the revenue or income to be derived from the rapid transit system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29253.

The covenants, conditions and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Special Assessment Bonds [29260. - 29262.]

29260.

In addition to all other powers granted under this part, the district shall have the right to acquire, construct and complete any improvements authorized hereunder by special assessment proceedings. The Improvement Act of 1911 and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 are applicable to the district and the powers and duties conferred by those acts upon the boards, officers and agents of the district; provided, that the improvements authorized to be constructed or acquired by this section are limited to those permitted to be constructed or acquired by the district under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29261.

An assessment district formed or proposed to be formed under this part, on the acquisition of any property or the construction of any improvement thereby, shall not be subject to any of the provisions of the District Investigation Law of 1933.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29262.

An assessment district formed or proposed to be formed under this part, on the acquisition of any property or the construction of any improvement thereby, shall not be subject to any of the provisions of the Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Reissuance of Bonds, Notes, Coupon or Other Evidence of Indebtedness, Lost, Destroyed, Defaced or Mutilated [29270. - 29271.]

29270.

If lost or completely destroyed, any bond, note, coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed bond, note, coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness, upon the owner furnishing all of the following to the satisfaction of the district:

(a) Proof of ownership.

(b) Proof of loss or destruction.

(c) An undertaking to indemnify the district against any loss incurred on account of the bond, note, coupon, or
 other evidence of indebtedness.

(d) Payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new bond, note, coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

29271.

If defaced, mutilated, or partially destroyed, any bond, note, coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness may be reissued in the form and tenor of the defaced or partially destroyed bond, note, coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness, to the bearer, or if registered, to the registered holder, at his expense, on surrender of the defaced or partially destroyed bond, note, coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness, and on such other conditions as the resolution authorizing the reissuance may provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Past Due Bonds [29280. - 29282.]

29280.

When a bond, note, interest coupon, or other evidence of indebtedness payable from funds in the custody of the chief financial officer of the district is presented to the chief financial officer for payment and is not paid for want of funds, the
 chief financial officer
 shall endorse upon it “Not paid for want of funds,” the date of presentation, and a serial number indicating the order of presentation, and shall sign or stamp their name on it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 12.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29281.

Upon receipt of the first money in the treasury applicable to their payment, the chief financial officer shall set apart the amount necessary to pay the past due bonds, notes, coupons, or other evidences of
 indebtedness that have been registered for want of funds. The chief financial officer shall give notice by registered mail to the owner or holder of the registered bonds, notes, coupons, and other evidences of indebtedness, at the address last filed, stating that the chief financial officer is ready to pay for them. The bonds, notes, coupons, and other evidences of indebtedness shall be paid from
 that money, in the order of their registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 13.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

29282.

If the registered bonds, notes, coupons, and other evidences of indebtedness are not presented for payment within 30 days from mailing of the notice, the chief financial officer shall apply the fund set aside to the payment of the unpaid registered bonds, notes, coupons, and other evidences of indebtedness next in order, until all registered bonds, notes, coupons, and other evidences of indebtedness have been called.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 106, Sec. 14.   (AB 2325)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. General Provisions [29290. - 29293.]

29290.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the district under the provisions of this part, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the State of California, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1967.)
-------------------------------------------

29291.

An action to determine the validity of bonds or other evidences of indebtedness may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2117.)
-------------------------------------------

29292.

Any person who, without probable cause, institutes in any court, state or federal, any action or proceeding contesting the validity of the issuance or sale by the district of any bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this part, and who does not prevail in such action or proceeding, shall be liable in damages to the district, in an amount which will compensate the district for all the detriment proximately caused thereby, or which, in the ordinary course of things, would be likely to result therefrom. He shall also be liable for the costs and attorney’s fees paid or incurred in the defense of the action or proceeding. No proceeding contesting the
 validity of the issuance or sale by the district of any bonds or other evidences of indebtedness authorized by this part shall be instituted following the expiration of 60 days from and after the date of the election authorizing the issuance of the bonds or, in the case of indebtedness for which an election is not required, 60 days from and after the date of the resolution of the board authorizing the issuance of the indebtedness involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29293.

Notwithstanding any other statutory provision to the contrary, the district may pledge all or any part of income received under Section 29123 to the payment of any revenue bonds to be issued pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 29240) of this chapter or the payment of any equipment trust certificates to be issued pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 29250) of this chapter. Income so pledged may be declared in such pledge to be revenues of the enterprise for all purposes of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, notwithstanding anything to the contrary therein contained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 944.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Annexation [29500. - 29590.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation Agreement [29500. - 29504.]

29500.

Any county not included within the boundaries of the district, including a county which has withdrawn from the district pursuant to Chapter 10 of this part, may be annexed thereto in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29501.

The board of supervisors of the county proposed to be annexed shall agree in writing with the board of directors of the district upon the terms and conditions of annexation, which agreement (among other things) may provide for the levy and collection of special taxes within the county in addition to the taxes elsewhere in this part provided for, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, the incurring or assumption of indebtedness, or the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29502.

As a condition of annexation, the district shall require any county seeking to annex to the district to reimburse the district for the county’s equitable share of the previously incurred cost of financing capital expenditures within the district theretofore imposed by taxation on territory within the district. The amount of reimbursement due from such county, unless otherwise provided for in the annexation agreement entered into pursuant to Section 29501 of this code, shall be computed on the following basis: one-half in the proportion that the population of the county bears to the total population of the district and one-half in the proportion that the assessed value
 of the real estate of the county bears to the total assessed value of the real estate of the district. Determinations of population shall be made by the district on the latest official information available to it. Determinations by the district as to the amount of capital expenditures shall be conclusive in each case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1518.)
-------------------------------------------

29503.

As an alternative method of annexation, a petition may be presented to the board of supervisors of a county proposed to be annexed, signed by qualified electors of the county, in number to at least ten (10) percent of the total vote cast at the last general election within the county. The petition shall contain statements and declarations setting forth the reason for annexation. Such petition may be on separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be. The clerk of the board of supervisors of such county shall compare the
 signatures with the affidavits of registration and certify to the board of supervisors the sufficiency or insufficiency of such petition. If found and certified by the clerk as being sufficient, such petition shall have all the force and effect of a resolution adopted by the board of supervisors of such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29504.

Upon receipt of a petition pursuant to Section 29503, the board of supervisors shall communicate with the board and negotiate an annexation agreement and hold an election as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Approval by District [29520. - 29526.]

29520.

The agreement shall become effective and be binding upon the district and the county when approved in the manner set forth in this chapter. The board of directors of the district shall by ordinance setting forth the agreement at length declare its intention of causing it to be executed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29521.

The ordinance, together with a notice fixing the time and place for hearing thereon, shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than thirty (30) nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of the publication of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29522.

At the hearing any person interested may file with the board of directors of the district written objections to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29523.

Upon the hearing the board of directors of the district shall determine whether or not the agreement will be carried into execution and shall hear and determine all objections thereto. Failure of any person interested in the district or in the matter of the proposed execution of the agreement to show cause in writing pursuant to Section 29522, constitutes an assent on his part to a change in the boundaries of the district and to the execution of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29524.

Any hearing on the agreement may be adjourned from time to time by the board of directors of the district without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of the meeting fixing the time and place of adjournment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29525.

If no protests are filed or if the protests filed are overruled and denied, the board of directors of the district shall thereupon by resolution finally approve the agreement and authorize its execution, which shall become effective when executed by the county, duly authorized in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29526.

When executed by the district the agreement shall be dated and an executed copy filed with the secretary of the district. An executed copy shall also be filed with the clerk of the county to be annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approval by County [29540. - 29545.]

29540.

At any time after the board of directors of the district has finally approved the agreement of annexation the board of supervisors of the county to be annexed shall cause an election to be held in the county to determine whether the county will be annexed to the district upon the terms and conditions stated in the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29541.

Notice of election shall be published once a week for two successive weeks (two publications) in a newspaper of general circulation published within the county, and shall either state that a copy of the annexation agreement is on file in the office of the clerk of the county proposed to be annexed, and open to the inspection of all persons interested, or set forth the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation at length, in the discretion of the board of supervisors calling the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 601.)
-------------------------------------------

29542.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and in addition shall set forth the proposition of annexation substantially as follows: Shall the County of ________________ be annexed to San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District in accordance with and subject to all the terms and conditions of an agreement of
 annexation dated _________ now on file in the office of the Clerk of _______________ County?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29543.

If upon a canvass of the election it is found that a majority of all votes cast on the proposition at the election were cast in favor of the annexation, the proposition and all of the terms and conditions of the agreement of annexation shall be deemed carried and approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29544.

If the proposition fails to carry, the result shall be entered upon the minutes of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29545.

If the proposition receives the vote of the requisite majority of voters, the board of supervisors of the county shall enter in its minutes an order declaring the result of the election and shall thereupon cause the agreement of annexation to be executed by its duly authorized officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment of Annexation [29560. - 29560.]

29560.

Upon receipt by the district of a copy of the agreement of annexation properly executed by the district and the county proposed to be annexed the board of directors of the district shall pass a resolution declaring the county annexed to the district, and shall cause a certified copy of the resolution to be filed with the Secretary of State. From and after the date of filing of the resolution with the Secretary of State the annexation of the county to the district is complete.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Effect of Annexation [29570. - 29570.]

29570.

From and after the date of annexation the board of directors of the district shall levy upon all of the property in the county annexed such taxes, tolls, or charges as are necessary to provide funds for the payment of the indebtedness assumed by the county or otherwise necessary to comply with the terms and conditions of the annexation agreement, all in addition to the general district taxes authorized elsewhere in this part to be levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contest of Annexation [29580. - 29580.]

29580.

The validity of any proceedings for the annexation of any county to the district shall not be contested in any action unless the action is brought within three (3) months after the completion of the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Annexation of Land Owned Solely by District [29590. - 29590.]

29590.

When the district is the sole owner of any tract of land within the County of San Mateo upon which is located works and facilities of the district, the board, upon determining that the inclusion of that land will be for the best interests of the district, may, by resolution, declare that such land shall be included in the district. The inclusion of such land within the district is effective immediately upon the adoption of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 513.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Withdrawal From District [29650. - 29654.]

29650.

Any county, the board of supervisors of which does not approve the reports of the board of directors of the district submitted pursuant to Section 29154 or 29157, may be withdrawn from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29650.1.

In addition to the right of withdrawal of a county as provided in Section 29650, any county may withdraw from the district at any time prior to the date of adoption by the board of a resolution calling a special election to submit to the qualified voters of the district a proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness as provided in Section 29158, provided the board of directors of the district elects to accept for filing and approves a resolution of withdrawal adopted by the board of supervisors of the county seeking withdrawal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1962, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

29651.

Withdrawal from the district shall be by a resolution adopted by a majority vote of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29652.

The withdrawal of any county from the district pursuant to this chapter shall not be effective until the resolution of withdrawal adopted by the board of supervisors is filed with the board of directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29653.

The withdrawal of a county pursuant to this chapter does not invalidate any taxes or assessments levied or assessed against any property in the county prior to withdrawal, nor relieve such property of any other financial obligation or debt of the district incurred prior to withdrawal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

29654.

Any county which is withdrawn from the district pursuant to this chapter may be subsequently annexed thereto on compliance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 29500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 105.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Special Service Districts [29660. - 29740.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proposal of Formation [29660. - 29666.]

29660.

One or more special service districts for any of the purposes in which the district is authorized to engage may be created within the boundaries of the district. Such special service districts may consist of one or more cities, with or without unincorporated territory, or unincorporated territory alone. Cities or unincorporated territory included within a special service district may be in the same or separate counties and need not be contiguous. No city shall be divided in the formation of such special service district, but a city may be in more than one special service district formed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29661.

Proceedings for the creation of a special service district may be initiated by resolution of the legislative body or bodies of the city or cities proposed to be included in such special service district and if unincorporated territory is proposed to be included in such special service district by resolution of the board or boards of supervisors of the county or counties in which such unincorporated territory is situated, or if only unincorporated territory is proposed to be included in such special service district, by resolution of the board or boards of supervisors of the county or counties in which such unincorporated territory is situated. Such resolution or
 resolutions shall declare that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special service district, shall describe its boundaries and shall request the formation of such special service district. When the entire area of a public agency is to be included in the special service district, it may be described by name. Certified copies of the resolution or resolutions shall be filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29662.

As an alternative to the initiation of proceedings for the formation of a special service district by resolution or resolutions, a petition may be filed with the secretary of the district signed by voters equal in number to at least 25 percent of the registered voters registered within the proposed special service district as determined from the affidavits of registration. The boundaries of the proposed special service district shall be described in the petition; provided, that when the entire area of a public agency is to be included in the special service district, it may be described by name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29663.

The petition shall declare that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special service district within the area of the district described in the petition. The petition may include one or more separate documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29664.

The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures in the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county elections official, and shall certify to the board as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

29665.

The following provisions of the Government Code shall not apply to this chapter or any proceeding taken thereunder:

(a) Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54775), Part 1, Division 2 of Title 5, relating to local agency formation commissions.

(b) The District Investigation Law of 1933 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 58500), Division 1 of Title 6).

(c) Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 58850), Division 1 of Title 6, relating to county boundary commissions.

(d) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 58900), Division 1 of Title 6, relating to notice of formation or change in boundaries of districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29666.

Nothing contained herein shall allow the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, or any special service district formed hereunder, to exercise any jurisdiction, taxing, or otherwise, over any territory heretofore withdrawn from the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 29650) of the Public Utilities Code, or never annexed thereto pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 29500) of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [29670. - 29674.]

29670.

Within 30 days after receipt of the resolution or resolutions of the legislative body or bodies or receipt of the certification of the sufficiency of a petition by the secretary of the district, the board shall by resolution designate the special service district as “San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District, Special Service District No. ____ (here insert number)” (all such special service districts shall be numbered consecutively), shall fix a time and place for a hearing on the proposed creation of the special service district and shall not later than five days after fixing the time and place of hearing publish notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29671.

The notice of hearing shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district. The board, in its discretion, may give such additional notice as it deems desirable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29672.

The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days from the date of the publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29673.

At or before the hearing, any person interested may file with the secretary of the district written objections to the creation of the special service district or to the inclusion of his property therein. Upon the hearing the board shall hear and determine all protests and objections. The hearing may be continued from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of its meeting fixing the time and place of the continued hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------

29674.

If no protests are filed or if the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall by resolution approve the creation of the special service district and shall by resolution call an election as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 29680).

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1495.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election [29680. - 29685.]

29680.

At the time of the approval of the creation of a special service district, the board shall call an election in the territory proposed to be included in the special service district for the purpose of submitting to the voters in such territory the question of whether the special service district shall be created and established.
